Utah statutes.
59-12-2208.   Legislative body approval requirements -- Voter approval
requirements.
(1)  Subject to the other provisions of this section, before imposing a sales
and use tax under this part, a county, city, or town legislative body shall:
(a)  obtain approval to impose the sales and use tax from a majority of the
members of the county, city, or town legislative body; and
(b)  submit an opinion question to the county's, city's, or town's registered
voters voting on the imposition of the sales and use tax so that each
registered voter has the opportunity to express the registered voter's opinion
on whether a sales and use tax should be imposed under this section.
(2)  The opinion question required by this section shall state:
"Shall (insert the name of the county, city, or town), Utah, be authorized to
impose a (insert the tax rate of the sales and use tax) sales and use tax for
(list the purposes for which the revenues collected from the sales and use tax
shall be expended)?"
(3) (a)  Subject to Subsection (3)(b), the election required by this section
shall be held:
(i)  at a regular general election conducted in accordance with the procedures
and requirements of Title 20A, Election Code, governing regular general
elections; or
(ii)  at a municipal general election conducted in accordance with the
procedures and requirements of Section 20A-1-202.
(b) (i)  Subject to Subsection (3)(b)(ii), the county clerk of the county in
which the opinion question required by this section will be submitted to
registered voters shall, no later than 15 days before the date of the
election:
(A)  publish a notice:
(I)  once in a newspaper published in that county; and
(II)  as required in Section 45-1-101; or
(B) (I)  cause a copy of the notice to be posted in a conspicuous place most
likely to give notice of the election to the registered voters voting on the
imposition of the sales and use tax; and
(II)  prepare an affidavit of that posting, showing a copy of the notice and
the places where the notice was posted.
(ii)  The notice under Subsection (3)(b)(i) shall:
(A)  state that an opinion question will be submitted to the county's, city's,
or town's registered voters voting on the imposition of a sales and use tax
under this section so that each registered voter has the opportunity to
express the registered voter's opinion on whether a sales and use tax should
be imposed under this section; and
(B)  list the purposes for which the revenues collected from the sales and use
tax shall be expended.
(4)  A county, city, or town that submits an opinion question to registered
voters under this section is subject to Section 20A-11-1203.
(5)  Subject to Section 59-12-2209, if a county, city, or town legislative
body determines that a majority of the county's, city's, or town's registered
voters voting on the imposition of a sales and use tax under this part have
voted in favor of the imposition of the sales and use tax in accordance with
this section, the county, city, or town legislative body shall impose the
sales and use tax.
(6)  If, after imposing a sales and use tax under this part, a county, city,
or town legislative body seeks to impose a tax rate for the sales and use tax
that exceeds or is less than the tax rate stated in the opinion question
described in Subsection (2) or repeals the tax rate stated in the opinion
question described in Subsection (2), the county, city, or town legislative
body shall:
(a)  obtain approval from a majority of the members of the county, city, or
town legislative body to impose a tax rate for the sales and use tax that
exceeds or is less than the tax rate stated in the opinion question described
in Subsection (2) or repeals the tax rate stated in the opinion question
described in Subsection (2); and
(b)  in accordance with the procedures and requirements of this section,
submit an opinion question to the county's, city's, or town's registered
voters voting on the tax rate so that each registered voter has the
opportunity to express the registered voter's opinion on whether to impose a
tax rate for the sales and use tax that exceeds or is less than the tax rate
stated in the opinion question described in Subsection (2) or repeal the tax
rate stated in the opinion question described in Subsection (2).
